Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-206.5 Group insurance
plans. (a) Notwithstanding section 431:12-104(a), any insurer may issue
any insurance coverage on a group plan, without restriction as to the purpose
of the group, occupation, or type of group. Group insurance rates shall not be
considered to be unfairly discriminatory, if they are averaged broadly among
other persons insured under the group plan.

(b) This section is additional to article 12
and other provisions of law, with the exception of section 431:12-104(a), relating
to group insurance. [L 1997, c 251, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 275, §13]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next